Utah statutes.
75-3-103.   Necessity of appointment for administration.
Except as otherwise provided in Title 75, Chapter 4, to acquire the powers and
undertake the duties and liabilities of a personal representative of a
decedent, a person must be appointed by order of the court or registrar,
qualify and be issued letters. Administration of an estate is commenced by the
issuance of letters.
